Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 31 Department of Public Advocacy
31.120.
Determination of whether person needy — Factors for determination — Affidavit of indigency.

The determination of whether a person covered by KRS

31.110

is a needy person shall be deferred no later than his or her first appearance in court or in a suit for payment or reimbursement under KRS

31.211

, whichever occurs earlier.

The court of competent jurisdiction in which the case is pending shall then determine, with respect to each step in the proceedings, whether he or she is a needy person. However, nothing shall prevent appointment of counsel at the earliest necessary proceeding at which the person is entitled to counsel, upon declaration by the person that he or she is needy under the terms of this chapter. In that event, the person involved shall be required to make reimbursement for the representation if he or she later is determined not a needy person under the terms of this chapter.

A person who, after conviction, is sentenced while being represented by a public defender shall continue to be presumed a needy person, and the court, at the time of sentencing, shall enter an Order In Forma Pauperis for purposes of appeal without having to show further proof of continued indigency, unless the court finds good cause after a hearing to determine that the defendant should not continue to be considered an indigent person.

In determining whether a person is a needy person and in determining the extent of his or her and, in the case of an unemancipated minor under KRS 31.100(5)(c), his or her custodial parents’ or guardians’ inability to pay, the court concerned shall consider such factors as:

Income;

Source of income;

Property owned;

Number of motor vehicles owned and in working condition;

Other assets;

Outstanding obligations;

The number and ages of his or her dependents;

The poverty level income guidelines compiled and published by the United States Department of Labor;

Complexity of the case;

Amount a private attorney charges for similar services;

Amount of time an attorney would reasonably spend on the case; and

Payment of money bail, other than a property bond of another, whether deposited by the person or another, to secure the person’s release from confinement on the present charge of which he or she stands accused or convicted; and

Any other circumstances presented to the court relevant to financial status.

Release on bail, or any other method of release provided in KRS Chapter 431, shall not necessarily prevent him or her from being a needy person. In each case, the person and, if an unemancipated minor under KRS 31.100(5)(c) and (d), his or her custodial parent or guardian, subject to the penalties for perjury, shall certify by affidavit of indigency which shall be compiled by the pretrial release officer, as provided under KRS Chapter 431 and Supreme Court Rules or orders promulgated pursuant thereto, the material factors relating to his or her ability to pay in the form the Supreme Court prescribes.

The affidavit of indigency, to be subscribed and sworn to by the person and, in the case of an unemancipated minor under KRS 31.100(5)(c), by his or her custodial parent or guardian, shall be as set out herein and contain, at a minimum, the following information:

“Commonwealth of Kentucky County of Affiant , being first duly sworn says that he or she is not now represented by private counsel and that he or she does not have the money or assets out of which to employ one; that he or she is indigent and requests the court to appoint counsel. Affiant states that he or she is presently (fill in the blank with one (1) of the following: unemployed, employed full-time, employed part-time, or employed on a seasonal basis) Affiant states that his or her weekly income is ; and that he or she receives (circle any of the following which apply and fill in the blank if necessary) Welfare Food stamps Social Security Workers’ compensation Unemployment Retirement disability Other Affiant states that he or she owns the following property: Description Value ; Affiant states that he or she has the following dependents: Name Age Relationship ; Affiant states that he or she has the following obligations: To whom owed Amount owing Affiant understands and has been advised that he or she may be held responsible for the payment of part of the cost of legal representation. Affiant also understands that the cost of payment for legal representation will be determined by the judge after considering affiant’s financial condition, what private attorneys charge for similar services, how complicated the affiant’s case is, and the amount of time affiant’s attorney spends on affiant’s case. Signature of affiant Subscribed and sworn to before me this , day of , 20 Signature and title of officer administering the oath

Click to view

Perjury Warning: Affiant understands that any person knowingly making false statements in the above affidavit shall be subject to the penalties for perjury under KRS Chapter 523, the maximum penalty for which is five (5) years’ imprisonment. Affiant declares under penalty of perjury that he or she has read the above affidavit and that it is true and complete to the best of his or her knowledge.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 353, § 12; 1976, ch. 258, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 24, § 3; 1978, ch. 155, § 29, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 11, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 334, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 104, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 241, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 395, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 491, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 283, § 12, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 87, § 4, effective July 15, 2014.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Judicial Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 162, Pt. I, A, 1, a, (2) at 980.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 6, (5) at 1690.

31.125.
Determination of indigency of child’s custodian — Payment for defense of child — Exceptions.

If court-appointed counsel has been provided to a juvenile in any proceeding, the court appointing the counsel shall:

Ascertain who has legal custody of the child; and

Ascertain whether the person who has legal custody of the child is indigent and would be entitled to representation pursuant to this chapter if the person having custody of the child were a criminal defendant.

If it is determined that the child has two (2) living parents or two (2) living guardians, the determination made pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section shall be made with regard to both parents or both guardians to the extent practical.

If it is determined that both parents or both guardians of a child before the court would not qualify for public defense services as an indigent pursuant to this chapter, then both parents or both guardians shall be ordered to pay for the defense of the child if it is practical to bring both parents or guardians before the court.

If it is determined that one (1) parent or guardian of a child before the court would not qualify for public defense services as an indigent pursuant to this chapter, then that parent or guardian shall be ordered to pay for the defense of the child if it is possible to bring the parent or guardian before the court.

Absent a showing of indigency:

The fact that a child’s parents are divorced may relieve a noncustodial parent of the obligation to pay for defense of the child.

The fact that a child is in the custody of a public agency shall relieve a parent from paying for the child’s defense.

The provisions of this section shall not apply if the parent or guardian was the victim of the juvenile’s alleged criminal act, or if the parent or guardian is the complainant in the delinquency proceeding.

Subsections (1) to (3) of this section shall not apply to public representation of a child from the time he would first be entitled to counsel, if an adult, until a determination of indigency is made as provided in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 358, § 5, effective July 15, 1997.

31.130.
Assignment of substitute attorney. [Repealed.]

31.140.
Waiver of right to counsel.

A person who has been appropriately informed under KRS

31.120

may waive in writing, or by other record, any right provided by this chapter, if the court concerned, at the time of or after waiver, finds of record that he has acted with full awareness of his rights and of the consequences of a waiver and if the waiver is otherwise according to law. The court shall consider such factors as the person’s age, education, and familiarity with English, and the complexity of the crime involved.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 353, § 14.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Gillig, Kentucky Post-Conviction Remedies and the Judicial Development of Kentucky Rule of Criminal Procedure 11.42, 83 Ky. L.J. 265 (1994-95).

31.150.
Recovery of money wrongfully received. [Repealed.]

31.160.
Provisions for joint representation by counties, cities and districts. [Repealed.]

31.165.
Conformity to rules and regulations. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

31.170.
Office for public advocacy — Establishment by fiscal court. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

31.180.
Facilities and services available to public advocates. [Repealed.]

31.185.
Facilities available to department — Ex parte request for funds for representation — Funding responsibility — Finance and Administration special account and payment.

Any defending attorney operating under the provisions of this chapter is entitled to use the same state facilities for the evaluation of evidence as are available to the attorney representing the Commonwealth. If he or she considers their use impractical, the court of competent jurisdiction in which the case is pending may authorize the use of private facilities to be paid for on court order from the special account of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The defending attorney may request to be heard ex parte and on the record with regard to using private facilities under subsection (1) of this section. If the defending attorney so requests, the court shall conduct the hearing ex parte and on the record.

Any direct expense, including the cost of a transcript or bystander’s bill of exceptions or other substitute for a transcript that is necessarily incurred in representing a needy person under this chapter, are charges against the county, urban-county government, charter county government, unified local government, or consolidated local government on behalf of which the service is performed and shall be paid from the special account established in subsection (4) of this section and in accordance with procedures provided in subsection (5) of this section. However, a charge under this subsection shall not exceed the established rate charged by the Commonwealth and its agencies.

The consolidated local government, charter county government, unified local government, fiscal court of each county, or legislative body of an urban-county government shall annually appropriate twelve and a half cents ($0.125) per capita of the population of the county, as determined by the Council of Local Governments’ most recent population statistics, to a special account to be administered by the Finance and Administration Cabinet to pay court orders entered against counties pursuant to subsection (1) or (3) of this section. The funds in this account shall not lapse and shall remain in the special account.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall pay all court orders entered pursuant to subsection (1) or (3) of this section from the special account until the funds in the account are depleted. If in any given year the special account, including any funds from prior years, is depleted and court orders entered against counties pursuant to subsection (1) or (3) of this section for that year or any prior year remain unpaid, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall pay those orders from the Treasury in the same manner in which judgments against the Commonwealth and its agencies are paid.

Expenses incurred in the representation of needy persons confined in a state correctional institution shall be paid from the special account established in subsection (4) of this section and in accordance with the procedures provided in subsection (5) of this section.

Only court orders entered after July 15, 1994, shall be payable from the special account administered by the Finance and Administration Cabinet or from the Treasury as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 358, § 11; 1994, ch. 395, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 491, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 283, § 13, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 346, § 8, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 87, § 5, effective July 15, 2014.

31.190.
Appropriation of money by fiscal court and cities. [Repealed.]

31.200.
Expenses chargeable to county and to public advocate. [Repealed.]

31.210.
Annual reports — Records. [Repealed.]

31.211.
Determination of ability to pay partial fee for representation and services at arraignment — Collection of unpaid partial fee by civil judgment — Partial fee credited to local office or department — Funds placed in special trust and agency account.

At arraignment, the court shall conduct a nonadversarial hearing to determine whether a person who has requested a public defender is able to pay a partial fee for legal representation, the other necessary services and facilities of representation, and court costs. The court shall order payment in an amount determined by the court and may order that the payment be made in a lump sum or by installment payments to recover money for representation provided under this chapter. This partial fee determination shall be made at each stage of the proceedings.

If the partial fee, or any portion thereof, is not paid by the due date, the court’s order is a civil judgment subject to collection under Civil Rule 69.03 and KRS Chapter 426.

All moneys received by the public advocate from indigent defendants pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be credited to the public advocate fund of the county in which the trial is held if the county has a plan pursuant to KRS

31.060

or 31.065(1) which has been approved by the public advocate pursuant to KRS

31.050

. Moneys credited to a county public advocate fund may be used only to support the public advocate program of that county.

All moneys collected by the public advocate from indigent defendants pursuant to subsection (1) of this section in counties with a local public advocacy system established by the public advocate pursuant to KRS 31.065(2) shall be credited to the Department of Public Advocacy special trust and agency account to be used to support the state public advocacy system.

If a person receives legal assistance or other benefit under this chapter to which he or she is not entitled or if a person receives legal assistance under this chapter and is financially able to pay for representation on the date the suit is brought, the public advocate, on behalf of the Commonwealth, shall recover, where practical, payment or reimbursement, as the case may be, from the person who received the legal assistance or his or her estate. Suit shall be brought within five (5) years after the date on which the aid was received.

Any attorney participating in a public advocacy plan shall forward all information which he or she may have which indicates that payment or reimbursement may be obtained pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

The duty of recovery contemplated by subsection (5) of this section shall extend against persons who were the custodial parents or guardians of unemancipated minors at the time these minors were deemed needy as defined in KRS 31.100(5)(c) or (d).

All moneys collected under this section shall be placed in a special trust and agency account for the Department of Public Advocacy, and the funds shall not lapse.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 283, § 14, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 87, § 8, effective July 15, 2014.

31.215.
Acceptance of fees by public advocacy attorneys prohibited — Exceptions.

Except for attorneys appointed pursuant to KRS

620.100

,

625.041

,

625.080

, and

31.120

, no attorney participating in a public advocacy plan shall accept any fees for the representation of any needy person as defined in this chapter from that person or anyone for his benefit and the fees for representation of that person shall be limited to the fees provided in this chapter. “Fees” shall include cash, property, or other pecuniary benefits of any kind.

Any attorney participating in a public advocacy plan who receives or attempts to collect a fee from a needy person as prohibited by subsection (1) above shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 283, § 15, effective July 15, 2002.

31.219.
Appeal by public advocacy attorney.

It shall be the duty of the attorney representing a client at trial under any public advocacy plan to file a notice of appeal if his or her client requests an appeal.

After the attorney has filed a notice of appeal as required by the Rules of Criminal Procedure, he or she shall forward to the Department of Public Advocacy a copy of the final judgment, the notice of appeal, a statement of any errors committed in the trial of the case which should be raised on appeal, and a designation of that part of the record that is essential to the appeal.

Any public advocacy attorney who is representing a client on appeal who after a conscientious examination of said appeal believes the appeal to be wholly frivolous after careful examinations of the record may request the court to which the appeal has been taken for permission to withdraw from the case. The attorney must file with that request a brief which sets forth any arguments which might possibly be raised on appeal. A copy of the request for permission to withdraw and the brief must be served upon the client in sufficient time so that the client may raise any argument he or she chooses to raise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 24, § 1; 1978, ch. 155, § 28, effective June 17, 1978; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 283, § 16, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 87, § 6, effective July 15, 2014.

31.220.
When chapter applies to United States courts.

This chapter applies only to representation in the courts of this state, except that it does not prohibit a defending attorney from representing a needy person in a federal court of the United States, if:

The matter involves a challenge to the validity, timing, or method of implementation of a judgment of a Kentucky state court in a criminal case;

The matter relates to the fact, duration, or conditions of confinement for a juvenile offender represented under KRS 31.100(5); or

Representation is under a plan of the United States District Court as required by the Criminal Justice Act of 1964.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 353, § 22; 1976, ch. 177, § 9; 2002, ch. 283, § 17, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 87, § 7, effective July 15, 2014.

31.230.
Protections — Sanctions. [Repealed and reenacted.]

31.235.
Payment for representation upon failure of department to provide attorney — Decision of public advocate final.

If a court, after finding that the Department of Public Advocacy fails to provide an attorney to a person eligible for representation under KRS Chapter 31, appoints, under the court’s inherent authority, an attorney to provide representation to the needy person, the public advocate is hereby authorized to pay reasonable and necessary fees and expenses subject to the following limitations:

No fee shall be paid in excess of the prevailing maximum fee per attorney paid by the Department of Public Advocacy for the type of representation provided, and no hourly rate shall be paid in excess of the prevailing hourly rate paid by the Department of Public Advocacy for the type of representation provided; and

Each fee plus expenses incurred in the defense shall be presented by the defense attorney to the Circuit Judge who shall review the fee and expenses request and shall approve, deny, or modify the amount of compensation and fee listed therein. After final approval of the fee and expenses the Circuit Judge shall, if state compensation is desired, certify the amount and transmit the document to the public advocate who shall review the fee and expense request and shall approve, deny, or modify the request. The request as approved or modified shall then be paid. Requests for payment of assigned counsel by the state shall be denied if the district has exceeded the amount of funds which may be allotted to it, if the district plan has not been approved, or if the public advocate finds that compensation is otherwise not warranted. The decision of the public advocate in all matters of fee and expense compensation shall be final.

History.

Repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 283, § 18, effective July 15, 2002.

31.240.
Compensation by counties of public advocates — State contributions. [Repealed.]

31.241.
Protections — Sanctions.

The protections provided by this chapter do not exclude any protection or sanction that the law otherwise provides.

History.

Repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 283, § 19, effective July 15, 2002.

31.250.
Acceptance of fees by public advocacy attorneys prohibited — Exceptions. [Repealed and reenacted.]